Georgia, session 2025_26, HB722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act establishing the State Court of Bryan County (formerly the City Court of Pembroke),
approved January 10, 1938 (Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 714), as amended, particularly by
an Act approved May 1, 2023 (Ga. L. 2023, p. 3851), is amended by revising Section 1.1 as
follows:
H. B. 722
- 1 -

LC 62 0117/AP
"SECTION 1.1.
There shall be one full-time chief judge of the State Court of Bryan County, who shall be
the present judge of said Court at the time of the effective date of this Act, and one
associate judge of such court. The chief judge shall serve the remainder of the term of
office to which he or she was elected. Future successors of the chief judge shall be elected
at the general election conducted immediately prior to the expiration of the term of office,
and they shall take office on the first day of January following their election and serve for
a term of office of four years and until their successors are duly elected and qualified. Said
chief judge shall have and may exercise all powers, duties, jurisdictions, privileges, and
immunities of the present judge of the State Court of Bryan County and shall serve in a
full-time capacity as permitted by O.C.G.A. Section 15-7-20. The compensation of the
chief judge shall be set by local act of the governing authority of Bryan County. The chief
judge of the state court shall receive all legally required benefits. The governing authority
of Bryan County may supplement such judge's salary. All of the expenditures authorized
herein are declared to be an expense of court and payable out of the county treasury as
such."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 1.2 as follows:
"SECTION 1.2.
The new position of associate judge of the state court shall be a part-time position, and such
judge shall not be permitted to engage in the practice of law in the State Court of Bryan
County. The associate judge as provided by this Act shall be appointed by the Governor
for a term beginning January 1, 2026, and expiring December 31, 2028, and until a
successor is elected and qualified. A successor to the associate judge shall be elected in
the manner provided by Code Section 21-2-138 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated
H. B. 722
- 2 -

LC 62 0117/AP
for the election of judges of the state courts in 2028 for a term of four years beginning on
January 1, 2029, and until the election and qualification of a successor. The associate
judge shall take office on the first day of January following the date of election. Said
associate judge shall have and may exercise all powers, duties, jurisdictions, privileges, and
immunities of the present judge of the State Court of Bryan County. The compensation of
the associate judge shall be set by local act of the governing authority of Bryan County.
The associate judge of the state court shall receive all legally required benefits. The
governing authority of Bryan County may supplement such judge's salary. All of the
expenditures authorized herein are declared to be an expense of court and payable out of
the county treasury as such."
SECTION 3.
Said Act is further amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 1.3.
Each judge of the State Court of Bryan County shall have such qualifications and shall be
subject to such restrictions and discipline as provided in Chapter 7 of Title 15 of the
Official Code of Georgia Annotated."
SECTION 4.
Said Act is further amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 1.4.
The full-time judge of the State Court of Bryan County shall be the chief judge of said
court. The chief judge shall have responsibility for the administration of the operations of
the State Court of Bryan County, including, but not limited to, budgeting, scheduling, and
the policies, rules, and standing orders of the State Court of Bryan County."
H. B. 722
- 3 -

LC 62 0117/AP
SECTION 5.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 6.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 722
- 4 -